California, session 20252026, AB1203.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the California Water Wise Designation Act. California Water Wise Designation Act SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares the following:(a) In the 2017–18 Regular Session of the Legislature, the California State Legislature passed Senate Bill 606 and Assembly Bill 1668 on water conservation and drought planning, which included provisions for advancing urban water use efficiency standards, variances, and performance measures. (b) The Department of Water Resources recommended commercial, industrial, and institutional (CII) best management practices pursuant to Senate Bill 606 and Assembly Bill 1668. A wide range of best management practices have been developed that focus on technical advancements and improved management practices that will increase the efficiency of water use in the CII sector. (c) The CII sector is fundamental to the California’s economy and structure. The CII sector employs residents, provides goods and services, and maintains the state’s position as a center for technology and innovation. Though California’s economy has grown, the water used in the state has generally remained consistent. Increasing water use efficiency is critical to growing and protecting the state’s economy and to reducing pressure on California’s water resources and environmental health.(d) Historical documentation shows that CII water use accounts for approximately 30 percent, or roughly 2,6000,000 acre-feet, of total urban water use in California.(e) California has proposed a statewide water supply strategy that lays out a vision for adapting to a future with at least 10 percent less usable water within the next two decades because of changing climate patterns. The statewide water supply strategy includes goals to employ more efficient water conservation techniques and recycle and reuse wastewater.SEC. 3. Section 10609.11 is added to the Water Code, to read:10609.11. (a) The department and the Office of Community Partnerships and Strategic Communications shall include, within the Save Our Water Campaign, a statewide “water wise” designation to be awarded to businesses in the CII sector.(b) The designation shall be awarded to businesses in the CII sector that meet or exceed the recommendations for CII water use best management practices pursuant to Section 10609.10.